Missouri, session 2026, SB1194.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 160.522, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 160.522,
3 to read as follows:
1 160.522. 1. The [department of elementary and
2 secondary education shall produce or cause to be produced,
3 at least annually, a school] state board of education shall
4 develop an annual accountability report card for each public
5 school district, each public school building in a school
6 district, and each public charter school in the state for
7 the purpose of providing information about school
8 performance in accordance with the provisions of this
9 section. In addition to providing information about student
10 performance, the report card shall be designed to satisfy
11 [state and] federal reporting requirements for the
12 disclosure of [statistics] information about students,
13 staff, finances, [academic achievement,] and other
14 [indicators] data. [The purpose of the report card shall be
15 to provide educational statistics and accountability
16 information for parents, taxpayers, school personnel,
17 legislators, and the print and broadcast news media in a
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1194 2
18 standardized, easily accessible form] Accountability report
19 cards shall be designed in a standardized, clear, and easily
20 accessible form so that they can be easily understood by
21 parents, taxpayers, school personnel, legislators, and the
22 media.
23 2. [(1) The department of elementary and secondary
24 education shall develop a standard form for the school
25 accountability report card.
26 (2) The information reported shall include, but not be
27 limited to, the following information reported by each
28 school district or charter school:
29 (a) The most recent accreditation rating;
30 (b) Enrollment;
31 (c) Rates of pupil attendance;
32 (d) High school dropout rate and graduation rate;
33 (e) The number and rate of suspensions of ten days or
34 longer and expulsions of pupils;
35 (f) The district or charter school ratio of students
36 to administrators and students to classroom teachers;
37 (g) The average years of experience of professional
38 staff and advanced degrees earned;
39 (h) Student achievement and grade-level equivalence
40 data as measured through the statewide assessment system
41 developed pursuant to section 160.518;
42 (i) Student scores on the ACT, along with the
43 percentage of graduates taking the test;
44 (j) Average teachers' and administrators' salaries
45 compared to the state averages;
46 (k) Average per-pupil current expenditures for the
47 district or charter school as a whole and by attendance
48 center as reported to the department of elementary and
49 secondary education;

SB 1194 3
50 (l) The adjusted tax rate of the district or charter
51 school;
52 (m) The assessed valuation of the district;
53 (n) The percentage of the district or charter school
54 operating budget received from state, federal, and local
55 sources;
56 (o) The percentage of students eligible for free or
57 reduced-price lunch;
58 (p) Data on the percentage of students continuing
59 their education in postsecondary programs;
60 (q) Information about the job placement rate for
61 students who complete district or charter school vocational
62 education programs;
63 (r) Whether the school district or charter school
64 currently has a state-approved gifted education program; and
65 (s) The percentage and number of students who are
66 currently being served in the district's or charter school's
67 state-approved gifted education program] The state board of
68 education shall assign the duties of implementing the
69 provisions of this section to the department of elementary
70 and secondary education or may contract with a private
71 entity in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.
72 3. [The report card shall permit the disclosure of
73 data on a school-by-school basis, but the reporting shall
74 not be personally identifiable to any student or education
75 professional in the state] The state board of education
76 shall provide an embargoed version of the school
77 accountability report cards for the previous school year to
78 each public school district, public school, and public
79 charter school by July 15 of each year.
80 4. [The report card shall identify each school or
81 attendance center that has been identified as a priority

SB 1194 4
82 school under sections 160.720 and 161.092. The report also
83 shall identify attendance centers that have been categorized
84 under federal law as needing improvement or requiring
85 specific school improvement strategies] Within thirty-six
86 hours of delivering the embargoed version of the report
87 cards to public school districts, public schools, and public
88 charter schools, the department of elementary and secondary
89 education shall publish in a clear and easily accessible
90 location on its website the district and school
91 accountability report cards for the previous school year.
92 5. [The report card shall not limit or discourage
93 other methods of public reporting and accountability by
94 local school districts. Districts shall provide information
95 included in the report card to parents, community members,
96 the print and broadcast news media, and legislators by
97 December first annually or as soon thereafter as the
98 information is available to the district, giving preference
99 to methods that incorporate the reporting into substantive
100 official communications such as student report cards. The
101 school district shall provide a printed copy of the district-
102 level or school-level report card to any patron upon request
103 and shall make reasonable efforts to supply businesses such
104 as, but not limited to, real estate and employment firms
105 with copies or other information about the reports so that
106 parents and businesses from outside the district who may be
107 contemplating relocation have access] By August 15 of each
108 year, each public school district, public school, and public
109 charter school shall publish in a clear and easily
110 accessible location on its website the district and school
111 accountability report cards from the previous school year.
112 6. [For purposes of completing and distributing the
113 annual report card as prescribed in this section, a school

SB 1194 5
114 district may include the data from a charter school located
115 within such school district, provided the local board of
116 education or special administrative board for such district
117 and the charter school reach mutual agreement for the
118 inclusion of the data from the charter school and the terms
119 of such agreement are approved by the state board of
120 education. The charter school shall not be required to be a
121 part of the local educational agency of such school district
122 and may maintain a separate local educational agency status]
123 The state board of education shall assign each public school
124 district, public school, and public charter school one of
125 the following ratings, which shall be based on a zero to one
126 hundred scale:
127 (1) "A" for those districts and schools producing
128 excellent student outcomes;
129 (2) "B" for those districts and schools producing more
130 than satisfactory student outcomes;
131 (3) "C" for those districts and schools producing
132 satisfactory student outcomes;
133 (4) "D" for those districts and schools producing less
134 than satisfactory student outcomes; and
135 (5) "F" for those districts and schools failing to
136 produce adequate student outcomes.
137 7. (1) Each public school and public charter school
138 shall earn a school rating and may be eligible to earn a
139 performance-based funding award as provided in subdivision
140 (2) of this subsection. A public school district, public
141 school, or public charter school that does not test at least
142 ninety-five percent of its students in the state-mandated
143 annual summative assessment shall have its rating lowered by
144 one level.

SB 1194 6
145 (2) (a) The "Show Me Success Program" is hereby
146 created to provide financial awards to public schools that
147 experience high student performance and those with high
148 student academic growth. The program includes a "Success
149 Ready Graduate" measure for high schools.
150 (b) If funds are available, a public school or public
151 charter school shall receive performance-based funding of:
152 a. One hundred dollars per student who attends the
153 public school or public charter school if:
154 (i) The public school or public charter school is in
155 the top five percent of all public schools in Missouri in
156 student performance under the criteria set forth by rule of
157 the state board of education; or
158 (ii) The public school or public charter school is in
159 the top five percent of all public schools in Missouri in
160 student academic growth under the criteria set forth by rule
161 of the state board of education; and
162 b. Fifty dollars per student who attends the public
163 school or public charter school if:
164 (i) The public school or public charter school is in
165 the top ten percent but below the top five percent of all
166 public schools in Missouri in student performance under the
167 criteria set forth by rule of the state board; or
168 (ii) The public school or public charter school is in
169 the top ten percent but below the top five percent of all
170 public schools in Missouri in student academic growth under
171 the criteria set forth by rule of the state board of
172 education.
173 (c) The rewards listed in paragraph (b) of this
174 subdivision:
175 a. Shall begin after the 2026-27 state-mandated annual
176 summative assessment; and

SB 1194 7
177 b. Shall be based upon the results of the state-
178 mandated annual summative assessment.
179 (d) Funds shall be distributed to the school's fiscal
180 agent and placed in the appropriate school account and shall
181 be used for nonrecurring bonuses to the school faculty and
182 classroom staff.
183 8. The department of elementary and secondary
184 education shall use a criteria-referenced growth measure,
185 called "growth to proficiency", in addition to the existing
186 normative value-added growth measure. Growth to proficiency
187 shall evaluate for each student with two consecutive years
188 of Missouri assessment program performance levels whether
189 that student has made sufficient academic progress to put
190 such student on a trajectory to reach grade-level
191 proficiency within three years or by grade ten, whichever
192 comes first.
193 9. The rating for a public school district, public
194 school, or public charter school shall be based on the
195 following factors:
196 (1) Student academic achievement status, calculated as
197 the percentage of students proficient or higher, on required
198 English language arts, mathematics, and science assessments
199 through the Missouri assessment program;
200 (2) Student academic growth in English language arts,
201 mathematics, and science using growth to proficiency and a
202 value-added growth metric:
203 (a) Of all students; and
204 (b) Of the lowest performing quartile of students;
205 (3) For high schools:
206 (a) Student four-year graduation rate;
207 (b) A success ready graduate measure, calculated by
208 the department of elementary and secondary education. The

SB 1194 8
209 measure shall include the number of students graduating with
210 merit or distinction, including consideration of advanced
211 placement scores of 3 or greater, International
212 Baccalaureate program credit scores of 4 or greater, dual
213 enrollment in core subjects with C course grade or higher,
214 passing an industry recognized credential or career
215 technical education certificate for a high-wage or high-
216 demand occupation, completion of an early associate or
217 baccalaureate degree, and completion of stackable
218 credentials.
219 10. For schools serving students in any of grades
220 kindergarten through grade eight, the rating assigned shall
221 be based on overall student academic achievement level,
222 value-added growth, and growth to proficiency. Achievement
223 level, value-added academic growth, and growth to
224 proficiency shall be calculated and reported separately for
225 English language arts, mathematics, and science. As a
226 portion of the rating assigned, academic achievement level
227 shall represent forty percent of the rating, value-added
228 growth shall represent thirty percent of the rating, and
229 growth to proficiency shall represent thirty percent of the
230 rating.
231 11. For high schools, at least seventy-five percent of
232 the rating assigned shall be based on overall student
233 academic achievement level, value-added growth, and growth
234 to proficiency. Achievement level, value-added academic
235 growth, and growth to proficiency shall be calculated and
236 reported separately for English language arts, mathematics,
237 and science. As a portion of the rating assigned, academic
238 achievement level shall represent twenty-five percent of the
239 rating, value-added growth shall represent twenty-five
240 percent of the rating, growth to proficiency shall represent

SB 1194 9
241 twenty-five percent of the rating, the success ready
242 graduate measure shall represent fifteen percent of the
243 rating, and the student four-year graduation rate shall
244 represent ten percent of the rating.
245 12. Public school districts, public schools, and
246 public charter schools shall also report, for high schools,
247 the number of graduates who, within six months of
248 graduation, attend postsecondary education or training
249 programs, serve in the military or in national or community
250 service, or are employed in a living-wage career as
251 determined by a governmental agency or non-governmental
252 organization with expertise in living-wage calculation.
253 13. For school districts, the annual report shall
254 follow the same method used for calculating a school grade
255 except at the district level.
256 14. The state board of education shall additionally
257 develop an annual accountability report card for the
258 department of elementary and secondary education for the
259 purpose of providing information about department
260 performance in supporting districts and schools in producing
261 positive outcomes for students. This report card shall
262 consider the following:
263 (1) The percentages of Missouri students annually
264 attending schools rated "A", "B", "C", "D", and "F", with
265 the objective being to increase the percentage of students
266 attending more highly rated schools each year;
267 (2) The performance of Missouri students on state
268 assessments relative to student performance on the National
269 Assessment of Education Progress, with the objective being
270 to ensure that student proficiency rates on both assessments
271 are in reasonable alignment; and

SB 1194 10
272 (3) An anonymous annual survey of all leaders of
273 Missouri local educational agencies regarding their
274 satisfaction with efficacy and timeliness of the support and
275 communication earned from the department of elementary and
276 secondary education.
277 15. The A-F grading scale for public schools and
278 public charter schools shall automatically increase to
279 ensure rigor in the calculation such that when success is
280 achieved, the following school year, expectations are raised
281 so performance does not stagnate. When sixty-five percent
282 of schools earn an A or a B, the following school year, the
283 school grading scale shall increase by five percentage
284 points to earn an A, B, C, and D.
✓